Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1653.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.714, subdivision 7a, is amended to read: Subd. 7a. Change of addressnew text begin or legal namenew text end ; loss or destruction of permit. (a) Within 30 days after changing new text begin the permit holder's legal name or new text end permanent address, or within 30 days of having lost or destroyed the permit card, the permit holder must notify the issuing sheriff of the change, loss, or destruction. Failure to provide notification as required by this subdivision is a petty misdemeanor. The fine for a first offense must not exceed $25. Notwithstanding section 609.531, a firearm carried in violation of this paragraph is not subject to forfeiture. (b) After notice is given under paragraph (a), a permit holder may obtain a replacement permit card by paying $10 to the sheriff. The request for a replacement permit card must be made on an official, standardized application adopted for this purpose under section 624.7151, and, except in the case of new text begin legal name or new text end an address change, must include a notarized statement that the permit card has been lost or destroyed.